Wyoming, session 2026, HB0110.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
Section 1. W.S. 21-13-309.1, 21-13-339 and 21-13-340
are created to read:

21-13-309.1. Education resource block grant model
components; retirement; health insurance.

(a) This section is intended to specify the education
resource block grant model components and computations
necessary to execute the 2025 cost of education study as
required by W.S. 21-13-309(t) and as adopted and modified
by the legislature.

(b) As used in this section:

(i) "Average daily membership" or "ADM" means
as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(i) and calculated pursuant
to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv);

(ii) "Education resource block grant model"
means as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv);

(iii) "Co-located school" means two (2) or more
schools, each with its own administrative structure, that
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
operate within the same physical facility, regardless of
whether the schools serve the same or different grade
bands;

(iv) "FTE" means full-time equivalency basis as
computed in accordance with the department of education
rule;

(v) "Grade band" means a school grade
configuration that falls within one (1) of the following
configurations:

(A) An elementary school grade band that
includes grades kindergarten through grade six (6) or any
combination of those grades;

(B) A middle school grade band that
includes grades five (5) through eight (8) or grade six (6)
through grades nine (9) or any combination of grades within
those ranges;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(C) A high school grade band that includes
grades eight (8) through grade twelve (12) or any
combination of those grades.

(c) The education resource block grant model
components and associated resources are as follows:

(i) Full day kindergarten. Funded for all
elementary school grade bands;

(ii) Core teachers. For any school with greater
than fifty (50) ADM, one (1.0) FTE for every sixteen (16)
ADM for grades kindergarten through three (3), one (1.0)
FTE for every twenty-two (22) ADM for grades four (4)
through eight (8) and one (1.0) FTE for every twenty-five
(25) ADM for grades nine (9) through twelve (12);

(iii) Elective/specialist teachers:

(A) Elementary school grade bands. FTE
equal to twenty percent (20%) of the core teachers
calculated pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(B) Middle school grade bands. FTE equal to
twenty percent (20%) of the core teachers calculated
pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

(C) High school grade bands. FTE equal to
thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the core
teachers calculated pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this
subsection.

(iv) For any school with greater than fifty (50)
ADM, additional career and technical education teachers.
FTE equal to thirty-four percent (34%) of each school's
career and technical education students as determined
pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(D)(I), divided by
twenty-five (25);

(v) Minimum teachers. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model:

(A) For any school with greater than fifty
(50) ADM, if the combined total FTE calculated pursuant to
paragraphs (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this subsection is less
than the applicable minimum specified in subdivisions (I)
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
through (III) of this subparagraph, the grade band shall be
provided the applicable minimum teacher FTEs as follows:

(I) For an elementary school grade
band with greater than fifty (50) ADM, six (6) FTE and for
an elementary school grade band with fifty (50) ADM or
less, six (6) FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated
by multiplying six (6) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the elementary school grade band ADM
and the denominator of which is fifty (50);

(II) For a middle school grade band
with greater than fifty (50) ADM, seven (7) FTE and for a
middle school grade band with fifty (50) ADM or less, seven
(7) FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by
multiplying seven (7) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the middle school grade band ADM and
the denominator of which is fifty (50);

(III) For a high school grade band
with greater than fifty (50) ADM, nine (9) FTE and for a
high school grade band with fifty (50) ADM or less, nine
(9) FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
multiplying nine (9) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the high school grade band ADM and
the denominator of which is fifty (50).

(B) For any school with fifty (50) ADM or
less, the minimum teacher FTEs shall be provided as
follows:

(I) For an elementary school, six (6)
FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by multiplying
six (6) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the numerator of which
is the school's ADM and the denominator of which is fifty
(50);

(II) For a middle school, seven (7)
FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by multiplying
seven (7) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the numerator of
which is the school's ADM and the denominator of which is
fifty (50);

(III) For a high school, nine (9) FTE
reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by multiplying nine
(9) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the numerator of which is
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
the school's ADM and the denominator of which is fifty
(50).

(vi) Summer school teachers. One (1.0) FTE for
every one hundred twenty (120) at-risk students identified
pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(A);

(vii) Extended day school teachers. One (1.0)
FTE for every one hundred twenty (120) at-risk students
identified pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(A);

(viii) English language learner teachers. One
(1.0) FTE for every one hundred (100) students identified
as limited English proficient in accordance with rules
enacted by the department of education pursuant to W.S.
21-13-309(m)(v)(A);

(ix) Instructional facilitators. Resourced at
the highest prototypical school model using total school
ADM:

(A) Elementary schools. One and one-half
(1.5) FTE for every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(B) Middle schools. One and one-half (1.5)
FTE for every three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;

(C) High schools. One and one-half (1.5)
FTE for every three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A)
through (C) of this paragraph, each school district shall
receive a minimum of one (1.0) FTE.

(x) At-risk/core tutors. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model using total school ADM.
One (1.0) FTE for every one hundred (100) at-risk students
identified pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(A), plus:

(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;

(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM.

(xi) Substitute teachers. An amount equal to:

(A) For FTEs, five and seven hundred
fifteen thousandths percent (5.715%) of the combined total
FTEs generated by paragraphs (ii) through (x) of this
subsection;

(B) For employer paid social security and
Medicaid benefits, the amount calculated in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph multiplied by a daily salary as
specified in subparagraph (xxxiv)(P) of this subsection,
multiplied by seven and sixty-five hundredths percent
(7.65%).

(xii) Counselors. Resourced at each grade band:

(A) Elementary school grade bands.
Effective school year 2027-2028 and each school year
thereafter, one (1.0) FTE for every three hundred thirty
(330) ADM;
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(B) Middle school grade bands. One (1.0)
FTE for every two hundred fifty (250) ADM;

(C) High school grade bands. One (1.0) FTE
for every two hundred fifty (250) ADM;

(D) Effective school year 2027-2028 and
each school year thereafter, notwithstanding subparagraphs
(A) through (C) of this paragraph, each school district
shall receive a minimum of one (1.0) FTE.

(xiii) Pupil support positions. Effective school
year 2027-2028 and each school year thereafter, one (1.0)
FTE for every one hundred (100) at-risk students computed
under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(A). For school year 2026-2027
only, the greater of:

(A) One (1.0) FTE for every one hundred
(100) at-risk students computed under W.S.
21-13-309(m)(v)(A); or

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(B) Resourced at the highest prototypical
school model using total school ADM:

(I) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE
for every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;

(II) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for
every three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;

(III) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for
every three hundred fifteen (315) ADM.

(xiv) Nurses. Effective school year 2027-2028
and each school year thereafter, resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:

(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;

(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A)
through (C) of this paragraph, each school district shall
receive a minimum of one-half (0.5) FTE.

(xv) Supervisory aides. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:

(A) Elementary schools. Two (2.0) FTE for
every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;

(B) Middle schools. Two (2.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;

(C) High schools. Three (3.0) FTE for every
six hundred thirty (630) ADM.

(xvi) Librarians. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
every three hundred thirty (330) ADM up to three hundred
thirty (330) ADM;

(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM up to three hundred fifteen
(315) ADM;

(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
six hundred thirty (630) ADM up to six hundred thirty (630)
ADM;

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A)
through (C) of this paragraph, each school district shall
receive a minimum of one-half (0.5) FTE.

(xvii) Library aides. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:

(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
each additional three hundred thirty (330) ADM above three
hundred thirty (330) ADM;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for each
additional three hundred fifteen (315) ADM above three
hundred fifteen (315) ADM;

(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for each
additional six hundred thirty (630) ADM above six hundred
thirty (630) ADM.

(xviii) Principals. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:

(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
each school with at least one hundred ten (110) ADM;

(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for each
school with at least one hundred five (105) ADM;

(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for each
school with at least one hundred five (105) ADM.

(xix) Assistant principals. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model using total school ADM:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(A) Elementary schools. The greater of:

(I) One (1.0) FTE for each additional
three hundred thirty (330) ADM above three hundred thirty
(330) ADM; or

(II) One (1.0) FTE for schools with
less than one hundred ten (110) ADM.

(B) Middle schools. The greater of:

(I) One (1.0) assistant principal
position for each additional three hundred fifteen (315)
ADM above three hundred fifteen (315) ADM; or

(II) One (1.0) FTE for schools with
less than one hundred five (105) ADM.

(C) High schools. The greater of:

(I) One (1.0) assistant principal
position for each additional three hundred fifteen (315)
ADM above three hundred fifteen (315) ADM; or
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(II) One (1.0) FTE for schools with
less than one hundred five (105) ADM.

(xx) School site secretaries. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model using total school ADM:

(A) Elementary schools. Two (2) FTE for
three hundred thirty (330) ADM, prorated down to one and
one-half (1.5) FTE for two hundred twenty (220) ADM,
prorated down to one (1.0) FTE for one hundred ten (110)
ADM, one (1.0) FTE prorated below one hundred ten (110)
ADM. For schools with greater than three hundred thirty
(330) ADM, one (1.0) additional FTE for each additional one
hundred sixty-five (165) ADM;

(B) Middle schools. Two (2.0) FTE for three
hundred fifteen (315) ADM, prorated down to one and
one-half (1.5) FTE for two hundred ten (210) ADM, prorated
down to one (1.0) FTE for one hundred five (105) ADM, one
(1.0) FTE prorated below one hundred five (105) ADM. For
schools with ADM greater than three hundred fifteen (315)
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
ADM, one (1.0) additional FTE for each additional one
hundred fifty-seven and one-half (157.5) ADM;

(C) High schools. Three (3.0) FTE for six
hundred thirty (630) ADM, prorated down to two (2.0) FTE
for three hundred fifteen (315) ADM, prorated down to one
and one-half (1.5) FTE for two hundred ten (210) ADM,
prorated down to one (1.0) FTE for one hundred five (105)
ADM, one (1.0) FTE prorated below one hundred five (105)
ADM. For schools with ADM greater than six hundred thirty
(630) ADM, one (1.0) additional FTE for each additional two
hundred ten (210) ADM.

(xxi) Instructional and library materials. Three
hundred dollars ($300.00) per ADM;

(xxii) Technology and equipment. Two hundred
fifty dollars ($250.00) per ADM;

(xxiii) Gifted and talented students.
Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per ADM.

(xxiv) Student activities:
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(A) School districts with two thousand
(2,000) or more ADM: eight hundred thirty-three dollars
($833.00) per high school grade band ADM, four hundred
forty-seven dollars ($447.00) per middle school grade band
ADM and thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per elementary school
grade band ADM;

(B) School districts with five hundred
(500) ADM: two thousand eighty-two dollars and fifty cents
($2,082.50) per high school grade band ADM, one thousand
one hundred seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($1,117.50)
per middle school grade band ADM and eighty-seven dollars
and fifty cents ($87.50) per elementary school grade band
ADM;

(C) School districts with one hundred fifty
(150) or fewer ADM: two thousand four hundred ninety-nine
dollars ($2,499.00) per high school grade band ADM, one
thousand three hundred forty-one dollars ($1,341.00) per
middle school grade band ADM and one hundred five dollars
($105.00) per elementary school grade band ADM;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(D) For school districts with less than two
thousand (2,000) ADM and more than five hundred (500) ADM
the per ADM amounts specified in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph shall be proportionally adjusted on a linear per
ADM basis to the per ADM amounts specified in subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph;

(E) For school districts with less than
five hundred (500) ADM and more than one hundred fifty
(150) ADM the per ADM amounts specified in subparagraph (B)
of this paragraph shall be proportionally adjusted on a
linear per ADM basis to the per ADM amounts specified in
subparagraph (C) of this paragraph.

(xxv) Professional development. One hundred
ninety-one dollars and forty-three cents ($191.43) per ADM;

(xxvi) Short cycle and formative assessments.
Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per ADM;

(xxvii) Central office staff. Central office
staff shall be calculated utilizing the school district's
ADM, as follows:
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(A) For school districts with five hundred
(500) ADM or less:

(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;

(II) One and one-half (1.5) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions;

(III) Two (2.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions;

(IV) One (1.0) FTE for a computer
technician position.

(B) For school districts with more than
five hundred (500) ADM and less than or equal to one
thousand (1,000) ADM:

(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(II) Two (2.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions at one thousand
(1,000) ADM prorated down to one and one-half (1.5) FTE for
five hundred (500) ADM;

(III) Three (3.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions at one thousand (1,000) ADM
prorated down to two (2.0) FTE for five hundred (500) ADM;

(IV) Two (2.0) FTE for computer
technician positions at one thousand (1,000) ADM prorated
down to one (1.0) FTE for five hundred (500) ADM.

(C) For school districts with more than one
thousand (1,000) ADM and less than or equal to two thousand
(2,000) ADM:

(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;

(II) Three (3.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions at two thousand
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(2,000) ADM prorated down to two (2.0) FTE for one thousand
(1,000) ADM;

(III) Six and one-half (6.5) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions at two thousand (2,000) ADM
prorated down to three (3.0) FTE for one thousand (1,000)
ADM;

(IV) Two and one-half (2.5) FTE for
computer technician positions at two thousand (2,000) ADM
prorated down to two (2.0) FTE for one thousand (1,000)
ADM.

(D) For school districts with more than two
thousand (2,000) ADM and less than or equal to four
thousand (4,000) ADM:

(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;

(II) Four (4.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions at four thousand
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(4,000) ADM prorated down to three (3.0) FTE for two
thousand (2,000) ADM;

(III) Ten (10.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions at four thousand (4,000) ADM
prorated down to six and one-half (6.5) FTE for two
thousand (2,000) ADM;

(IV) Five (5.0) FTE for computer
technician positions at four thousand (4,000) ADM prorated
down to two and one-half (2.5) FTE for two thousand (2,000)
ADM;

(V) Three (3.0) FTE for
director/coordinator positions at four thousand (4,000) ADM
prorated down to zero (0.0) FTE for two thousand (2,000)
ADM;

(VI) One (1.0) FTE for a network
supervisor position at four thousand (4,000) ADM prorated
down to zero (0.0) FTE for two thousand (2,000) ADM;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(VII) One (1.0) FTE for a software
manager position at four thousand (4,000) ADM prorated down
to zero (0.0) FTE for two thousand (2,000) ADM.

(E) For school districts with more than
four thousand (4,000) ADM and less than or equal to twelve
thousand (12,000) ADM:

(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;

(II) Four (4.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions;

(III) Twenty (20.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions at twelve thousand (12,000)
ADM prorated down to ten (10.0) FTE for four thousand
(4,000) ADM;

(IV) Fifteen (15.0) FTE for computer
technician positions at twelve thousand (12,000) ADM
prorated down to five (5.0) FTE for four thousand (4,000)
ADM;
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(V) Nine (9.0) FTE for
director/coordinator positions at twelve thousand (12,000)
ADM prorated down to three (3.0) FTE for four thousand
(4,000) ADM;

(VI) Two (2.0) FTE for network
supervisor positions at twelve thousand (12,000) ADM
prorated down to one (1.0) FTE for four thousand (4,000)
ADM;

(VII) Two (2.0) FTE for software
manager positions at twelve thousand (12,000) ADM prorated
down to one (1.0) FTE for four thousand (4,000) ADM;

(VIII) Ten (10.0) FTE for other
central office professional positions at twelve thousand
(12,000) ADM prorated down to zero (0.0) FTE for four
thousand (4,000) ADM.

(F) For school districts with more than
twelve thousand (12,000) ADM:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;

(II) Four (4.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions;

(III) Twenty (20.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions prorated up from twelve
thousand (12,000) ADM;

(IV) Fifteen (15.0) FTE for computer
technician positions prorated up from twelve thousand
(12,000) ADM;

(V) Nine (9.0) FTE for
director/coordinator positions prorated up from twelve
thousand (12,000) ADM;

(VI) Two (2.0) FTE for network
supervisor positions prorated up from twelve thousand
(12,000) ADM;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(VII) Two (2.0) FTE for software
manager positions prorated up from twelve thousand (12,000)
ADM;

(VIII) Ten (10.0) FTE for other
central office professional positions prorated up from
twelve thousand (12,000) ADM.

(xxviii) Central office nonpersonnel resources.
Six hundred six dollars ($606.00) per ADM;

(xxix) School custodians. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model for each school operating
for the immediately preceding school year:

(A) For schools with more than fifty (50)
ADM, calculated using the average of the four (4) factors
specified under subdivisions (I) through (IV) of this
subparagraph, plus an additional one-half (0.5) FTE for
middle or high schools:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(I) One (1.0) FTE for every thirteen
(13) FTE resourced under paragraphs (ii) through (v) of
this subsection;

(II) One (1.0) FTE for every three
hundred twenty-five (325) ADM;

(III) One (1.0) FTE for every thirteen
(13) classrooms;

(IV) One (1.0) FTE for every eighteen
thousand (18,000) square feet of authorized education
space, as determined by W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(G).

(B) District custodians. One (1.0) FTE for
every eighteen thousand (18,000) square feet of authorized
education space, multiplied by ten percent (10%) of the
total authorized education space for all school buildings
in the district, as determined under W.S.
21-13-309(m)(v)(G).

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(xxx) Maintenance workers. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model for each school operating
for the immediately preceding school year:

(A) A base FTE resourced using the average
of the four (4) factors specified under subdivisions (I)
through (IV) of this subparagraph, plus the additional
adjustments to the base FTE amount as provided in
subdivision (V) of this subparagraph:

(I) One and one-tenth (1.1) FTE per
school building;

(II) One (1.0) FTE for every sixty
thousand (60,000) square feet of authorized education
space, as determined under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(G),
multiplied by one and two-tenths (1.2);

(III) One (1.0) FTE for every one
thousand (1,000) ADM, multiplied by one and three-tenths
(1.3);

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(IV) One (1.0) FTE for every five
million dollars ($5,000,000.00) of the school district's
school year 2004-2005 general fund operating expenditures,
multiplied by one and two-tenths (1.2);

(V) The base FTE calculated under this
subparagraph for each school building shall be adjusted as
follows:

(1) A school level adjustment for
elementary schools equal to the product of the base FTE
multiplied by a factor of eight-tenths (0.8) less the base
FTE and for high schools equal to the product of the base
FTE multiplied by two (2) less the base FTE;

(2) A building age adjustment for
a school building that is less than ten (10) years old
equal to the product of the base FTE multiplied by a factor
of ninety-five hundredths (0.95) less the base FTE and for
a school building that is more than thirty (30) years old
equal to the product of the base FTE multiplied by a factor
of one and one-tenth (1.1) less the base FTE;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(3) A small district adjustment
for a school district with less than one thousand (1,000)
ADM equal to the base FTE plus the adjustments under
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subdivision, then
multiplied by a factor of one and one-tenth (1.1) less the
base FTE and the adjustments under subdivisions (1) and (2)
of this subdivision.

(xxxi) Groundskeepers. In making calculations
under this subparagraph:

(A) For school land acreage containing more
than one (1) school building, the resources shall be
generated at the highest applicable prototypical school
model using the total ADM of all schools on the land
acreage;

(B) Acreage acquired by a district after
July 1, 1997 shall be calculated using the lesser of the
actual site acreage on which the facility is situated or
the acreage specified in state construction department's
rules, provided that this limitation shall not apply if the
acreage was acquired through an exchange with another
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
governmental entity and the acreages involved in the
exchange were originally acquired by the district and the
governmental entity on or prior to July 1, 1997;

(C) A base groundskeeper FTE for each
school site for the immediately preceding school year shall
be equal to the authorized acreage computed under
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph multiplied by
ninety-three (93) hours per acre divided by two thousand
eight (2,008) hours of work per year. The base
groundskeeper FTE shall be adjusted by a factor equal to
the base groundskeeper FTE multiplied by one and
five-tenths (1.5) for middle school sites and two and
five-tenths (2.5) for high school sites;

(D) Groundskeeper FTE positions for
district level sites shall be equal to ten percent (10%) of
the school level groundskeeper FTE positions calculated
under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph.

(xxxii) Operations and maintenance supplies. The
authorized education space for each school building, as
determined under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(G), multiplied by one
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
dollar and two cents ($1.02) per square foot and adjusted
by a factor of one and one-tenth (1.1);

(xxxiii) Utilities. Actual school year 2024-2025
general fund expenditures by school district excluding
amounts reimbursed under W.S. 21-13-320 and 21-13-321
adjusted by the external cost adjustment in accordance with
W.S. 21-13-309(o). For additional buildings added or
removed from school district building inventories after
school year 2024-2025, one hundred percent (100%) of
2024-2025 district average utility expenditures per gross
square foot for district school buildings as adjusted by
the external cost adjustment in accordance with W.S.
21-13-309(o) multiplied by the additional or removed square
footage;

(xxxiv) Salaries. The average salaries for the
positions specified in this subsection shall be as follows:

(A) Superintendents: one hundred sixty-four
thousand three hundred sixty-seven dollars ($164,367.00);

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(B) Deputy/assistant superintendents: one
hundred twenty-four thousand nine hundred ninety-four
dollars ($124,994.00);

(C) Director/coordinators: one hundred
fifteen thousand nine hundred five dollars ($115,905.00);

(D) Other central office professional
personnel: ninety thousand dollars ($90,000.00);

(E) Network supervisor/software managers:
sixty-eight thousand five hundred sixteen dollars
($68,516.00);

(F) Computer technicians: sixty thousand
three hundred fifty-eight dollars ($60,358.00);

(G) Principals: one hundred fifteen
thousand nine hundred five dollars ($115,905.00);

(H) Assistant principals: one hundred eight
thousand nine hundred fifty-one dollars ($108,951.00);

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(J) Teachers, including instructional
facilitators, tutors, counselors, pupil support, librarians
and nurses: seventy thousand five hundred sixty dollars
($70,560.00);

(K) Secretary/accounting personnel:
forty-seven thousand four hundred thirty-two dollars
($47,432.00);

(M) Supervisory/library aides: twenty-nine
thousand four hundred thirty-four dollars ($29,434.00);

(N) Maintenance workers: fifty-three
thousand seven hundred twenty-four dollars ($53,724.00);

(O) Groundskeepers/custodians: thirty-seven
thousand six hundred five dollars ($37,605.00);

(P) Substitute teachers: one hundred
eighty-five dollars ($185.00) per day.

(xxxv) In determining the resources allocated to
each school district, each salary specified in paragraph
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(xxxiv) of this subsection shall be adjusted in the
following order:

(A) Multiplied by the external cost
adjustment adopted by the legislature pursuant to W.S.
21-13-309(o) and in accordance with paragraph (xxxviii) of
this subsection;

(B) Multiplied by the lowest regional cost
adjustment specified in subsection (g) of this section for
the applicable school year to establish a baseline salary;

(C) The baseline salary for each position
computed in subparagraph (B) of this subsection shall be
further multiplied by each school district's rebased
regional cost adjustment determined in subsection (g) of
this section for the applicable school year to determine
the salary for each school district for each position.

(xxxvi) Employer-paid payroll costs. In
determining the resources allocated to each school
district, each salary shall be multiplied by eight and
forty-one hundredths percent (8.41%), including:
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(A) Social security equal to six and
two-tenths percent (6.2%). Social security benefits shall
be limited to each salary up to the maximum taxable
earnings amount as of January 1 of the immediately
preceding school year;

(B) Medicare equal to one and forty-five
hundredths percent (1.45%);

(C) Workers' compensation equal to
seven-tenths percent (0.7%);

(D) Unemployment insurance equal to
six-hundredths percent (0.06%).

(xxxvii) Health insurance. For school year 2026–
2027 only, health insurance benefits shall be computed
under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(F) and multiplied by the total
FTE calculated under this subsection, excluding positions
calculated under paragraphs (vi) and (vii) of this section.
For school year 2027-2028, and each school year thereafter,
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
health insurance benefits shall be computed pursuant to
W.S. 21-13-340;

(xxxviii) External cost adjustment. The
following categories of model components shall be adjusted
by the external cost adjustment adopted by the legislature
pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(o):

(A) "Education materials category"
including the following components:

(I) Instructional and library
materials component resourced under paragraph (xxi) of this
subsection;

(II) Student activities component
resourced under paragraph (xxiv) of this subsection;

(III) Professional development
component determined under paragraph (xxv) of this
subsection;

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(IV) Central office nonpersonnel
resources under paragraph (xxviii) of this subsection;

(V) Operations and maintenance
supplies resources under paragraph (xxxii) of this
subsection.

(B) "Energy category" includes the
utilities component resourced under paragraph (xxxiii) of
this subsection;

(C) "Nonprofessional labor category"
includes salaries for secretaries and accounting staff,
supervisory and library aides, groundskeepers and
custodians and maintenance workers identified under
paragraph (xxxiv) of this subsection;

(D) "Professional labor category" including
salaries for superintendents, deputy and assistant
superintendents, directors and coordinators, other central
office professional personnel, network supervisors and
software managers, computer technicians, principals,
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
assistant principals and teachers identified under
paragraph (xxxiv) of this subsection.

(d) Amounts resourced through the education resource
block grant model for FTE generated pursuant to paragraphs
(c)(ii) through (x) of this section shall only be expended
by a school district for instructional purposes and shall
not be expended or transferred for any other purpose. As
used in the subsection, "instructional purposes" includes
individual, group or class instructional activities to
provide educational programs required under W.S. 21-9-101
by teachers, tutors, paraeducators or instructional aides
or any combination thereof, the use of instructional
facilitators or any other instructional activity to assist
in the instructional process. Nothing in this subsection
shall prohibit a district from hiring fewer or more
positions than resourced under paragraphs (c)(ii) through
(x) of this section, prohibit a district from hiring
paraeducators or instructional aides for instructional
purposes or prohibit a district from contracting to deliver
the educational program. Expenditures related to
technology and equipment or instructional materials are not
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
appropriate expenditures for instructional purposes under
this subsection.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
superintendent's total compensation paid by a school
district shall not exceed two hundred thirty-three and
one-third percent (233 1/3%) of the average teacher's total
compensation paid by that district for the applicable
school year. This subsection shall only apply to
superintendent employment contracts entered into, renewed
or amended on or after July 1, 2026.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
co-located schools shall be treated as a single school for
purposes of funding, staffing and resource allocation
through the education resource block grant model. The ADM
for co-located schools shall be aggregated, and no
component of the education resource block grant model, or
any categorical allocation shall be calculated or
distributed on a separate or duplicative basis for
co-located schools, unless expressly authorized by law.

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(g) The salary for each staffing category shall be
further adjusted for regional cost differences as follows:

(i) By the hedonic wage index as computed in the
2025 cost of education study. For school year 2027-2028 and
each year thereafter, the hedonic wage index shall be
updated annually by the legislative service office until it
is recalibrated in accordance with W.S. 21-13-309(t). Each
salary under paragraph (c)(xxxiv) of this section shall be
adjusted by the lowest annual hedonic wage index to
establish a baseline state average salary for each position
in the education resource block grant model. The baseline
state average salary shall be further adjusted by each
school district's rebased hedonic wage index with a minimum
of one hundred (100) as the index value or an adjusted
rebased hedonic wage index as computed in paragraph (ii) of
this subsection;

(ii) If the difference between a school
district's rebased Wyoming cost-of-living index and its
rebased hedonic wage index is greater than thirty-three
(33) percentage points, the difference, less thirty-three
(33) percentage points, shall be added to a district's
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
rebased hedonic wage index. The version of the Wyoming
cost-of-living index used under this paragraph for any
school year shall be the average of the six (6) consecutive
semi-annual index reports completed by January 1 of the
immediately preceding school year and each semi-annual
index report shall be rebased with the minimum of one (100)
as the index value.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
require a school district to pay salaries in the amounts
specified in this section. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, except as provided for school district
superintendents, a school district may compensate employees
in accordance with its adopted salary schedule.

21-13-339. Retirement; K-12 public school employees.

In addition to amounts resourced and computed by the
education resource block grant model and amounts reimbursed
under W.S. 21-13-320 and 21-13-321, the department of
education shall reimburse each school district for
retirement benefits equal to the percentage paid for state
employee members under W.S. 9-3-413 and 9-3-413.1, but
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
only for those employees' salaries paid from amounts
specified by W.S. 21-13-309.1, 21-13-320 or 21-13-321. If a
portion of an employee's total salary is paid from funds
other than those amounts specified by W.S. 21-13-309.1,
21-13-320 or 21-13-321, only the proportional amount shall
be subject to reimbursement. The department shall
promulgate rules regarding employee eligibility for
reimbursement under this section and the information
required from school districts to reimburse retirement
benefit costs under this section. The department shall
reimburse the amount computed under this section to each
school district monthly or in accordance with the schedule
provided under W.S. 21-13-313(c).

21-13-340. State employees' and officials' group
insurance reimbursements for K-12 public school employees.

(a) Commencing school year 2027–2028, in addition to
amounts resourced by the education resource block grant
model and reimbursed under W.S. 21-13-320 and 21-13-321,
each school district shall receive from the department of
education an amount equal to the monthly employer
contribution established by the department of
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
administration and information for school district
employees electing coverage in the state employees' and
officials' group insurance plan pursuant to W.S. 9-3-210
and 9-3-211, but only for those employees hired from
amounts specified by W.S. 21-13-309.1, 21-13-320 or
21-13-321. If a portion of an employee's total salary is
paid from funds other than those amounts specified by W.S.
21-13-309.1, 21-13-320 or 21-13-321, only the proportional
amount for the employer contribution shall be subject to
reimbursement. Each school district shall remit to the
department of administration and information the applicable
monthly premium for each covered employee or official in
accordance with W.S. 21-7-301(b). The department of
education shall promulgate rules regarding the employees
eligible for reimbursement under this section and any other
necessary information required to be collected from school
districts to reimburse the necessary amount for the
employer contribution under this section. The department of
education shall reimburse the amount computed under this
section to each school district monthly or in accordance
with the schedule provided under W.S. 21-13-313(c).

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(b) Commencing school year 2027–2028, each school
district shall participate in the state employees' and
officials' group insurance plan in accordance with W.S.
9-3-201 et seq.

Section 2. W.S. 9-3-413.1(a)(v), 16-4-105(b),
21-2-202(g), 21-2-204(b)(intro), 21-3-314(c)(i) and (vi),
21-13-101(a)(xiv), (xvi)(A)(II) through (IV) and (c),
21-13-102(e), 21-13-307 by creating a new subsection (c),
21-13-309(m)(iv)(A), (v)(intro), (B)(intro), (IV)(intro),
(G)(intro), (I), (II), (vi)(C), (o) and (u), 21-13-310(a)
by creating new paragraph (xv) and by renumbering (xv) as
(xvi), 21-13-313(b), (c), (e) and (g), 21-13-320(b)(intro),
(f), (g)(intro), (v)(intro), (A), (vi) and (m),
21-13-321(b) and (d), 21-13-338(a), (c)(intro), (i) through
(iii) and (e) and 21-13-504 are amended to read:

9-3-413.1. Members' and employers' contributions
based on actuarially determined contribution rates;
calculation of rates; reports.

(a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 fiscal biennium, the
retirement system shall calculate the percentage of salary
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
for members' contributions required under W.S. 9-3-412(a)
and for the employers' contribution required under W.S.
9-3-413 based on an actuarially determined contribution
rate in accordance with the following:

(v) After calculation of the actuarially
determined contribution rate under paragraph (ii) of this
subsection, the state budget department and the retirement
system shall calculate necessary amounts to account for any
changes in the appropriations necessary to fund the
contributions for the public employee retirement plan and
shall include those amounts in the budget prepared under
W.S. 9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014.1, including changes in
amounts for school districts necessary to account for the
employer's share of the actuarially determined contribution
rate in accordance with this section for benefits paid from
the education resource block grant model defined in W.S.
21-13-101(a)(xiv) and as enumerated in Attachment
A(b)(xxxviii), as defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii) in
accordance with 21-13-339;

16-4-105. Accumulated retained earnings or fund
surplus; capital improvements reserve.
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(b) Except as specifically prohibited under W.S.
21-13-504(b) for school district boards of trustees, a
municipality may appropriate funds from estimated revenue
in any budget year to a reserve for capital improvements
and for depreciation within any capital improvements fund,
and for the purpose of purchasing or replacing specified
equipment or a depreciation reserve for equipment, which
has been duly established by ordinance. Money in the
reserves may be allowed to accumulate from year to year
until the accumulated total is sufficient to permit
economical expenditure for the specified purposes.
Disbursements from reserves shall be made only by transfer
to a revenue account within a capital improvements fund
pursuant to an appropriation for the fund. The amount
appropriated to reserves under this subsection in any
budget year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the
municipality's total revenues for that budget year.

21-2-202. Duties of the state superintendent.

(g) Paragraphs (a)(xxxviii) and (xxxix) of this
section are repealed July 1, 2026 July 1, 2027.
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

21-2-204. Wyoming Accountability in Education Act;
statewide education accountability system created.

(b) A statewide education accountability system shall
be established by the state board through the department of
education in accordance with this section, which implements
the components of the education resource block grant model
as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv) and as contained in
Attachment "A" as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii)
21-13-309.1. The first phase of this system shall be a
school-based system that is based on student performance as
determined through multiple measures of school performance.
The goals of the Wyoming Accountability in Education Act
are to:

21-3-314. Students counted among district ADM;
determination of charter school funding.

(c) The charter school shall be entitled to the
following amounts:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(i) Except as provided in paragraph (vi) of this
subsection, one hundred percent (100%) of the foundation
program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(m) and
21-13-309.1 based upon the average daily membership of the
charter school, less amounts generated by the charter
school's membership under paragraph (b)(xxix) of
"Attachment A" as defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii)
21-13-309.1(c)(xxiv) and (xxvii) and less amounts specified
under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E)(III) through (V);

(vi) A percentage amount calculated by dividing
the charter school's average daily membership by the total
average daily membership of the charter school's respective
school district multiplied by the amounts generated from
the foundation program amount computed under W.S.
21-13-309(m) and paragraph (b)(xxix) of "Attachment A" as
defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii) 21-13-309.1(c)(xxiv) and
(xxvii).

21-13-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(xiv) "Education resource block grant model"
means the block grant model for Wyoming school finance
contained within the enumeration of model components
summarizing and executing recommendations within the 2010
2025 cost of education study as modified by the legislature
and as referenced in paragraph (xvii) of this subsection
contained in W.S. 21-13-309.1. "Education resource block
grant model" or "model" includes model spreadsheets updated
with technical corrections, all of which are enacted into
law, on file with the secretary of state and are maintained
and made available for public inspection by the state
superintendent under W.S. 21-2-202(e), and as may be
subsequently modified by the legislature prior to future
model recalibration required under W.S. 21-13-309(t);

(xvi) "Prototypical school model" means a school
level, comprised of cost, resource and enrollment
parameters, as described within the education resource
block grant model. The separate school levels identified
with the model are as follows:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(A) Elementary school - kindergarten
through grade five (5) modeled at cost and resource levels
for:

(II) Ninety-six (96) One hundred ten
(110) ADM;

(III) One hundred ninety-two (192) Two
hundred twenty (220) ADM; and

(IV) Two hundred eighty-eight (288)
Three hundred thirty (330) ADM.

(c) The education resource block grant model as
defined under paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section and as
included in "Attachment A" referenced in paragraph
(a)(xvii) of this section contained in W.S. 21-13-309.1 and
operationalized through the model spreadsheets, as each are
enacted into law, and including any technical correction
which may be implemented by rule and regulation of the
state superintendent under W.S. 21-2-202(e), shall be filed
with the secretary of state.

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
21-13-102. Maximum rate of school district tax;
recapture of excess; equalization of permissive levies.

(e) Annually on or before August 15 September 1 the
department shall notify each district subject to recapture
of the estimated amount due to the state during the current
fiscal year, using data from the previous school year. Upon
receipt of the state assessed values by school districts,
and not later than March 1 May 31 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall certify to each district subject
to recapture the amount of recapture for the fiscal year to
be remitted to the state. The amount certified shall
supersede the estimates certified on or before August 15
September 1. If a district can demonstrate financial
inability to make payments to the state as provided in
subsection (b) of this section, the superintendent of
public instruction may adjust the schedule of payments
provided by subsection (b) of this section if the financial
integrity of the foundation program will not be
jeopardized.

21-13-307. Eligibility to share in distribution of
money from foundation account; mandatory financial
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
reporting; prohibition of spending foundation program funds
on capital construction.

(c) In no event shall any school district transfer or
expend any foundation program amounts, defined under W.S.
21-13-101(a)(v), including but not limited to revenues
collected under W.S. 21-13-310 and amounts paid to the
school district for the purpose of funding operational
expenses under this chapter, for major building and
facility repair or replacement, as defined under W.S.
21-15-109(a)(iii), or for a project, as defined under W.S.
21-15-111(a)(iv) or for any educational building, office
building, portable building, teacherage or warehouse
building, as defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a).

21-13-309. Determination of amount to be included in
foundation program for each district.

(m) In determining the amount to be included in the
foundation program for each district, the state
superintendent shall:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(iv) Based upon reports from each district on
schools operating within that district for the current
school year and on grade configurations contained within
each reported school during that school year, compute the
average daily membership (ADM) for each reported school and
each grade within each reported school in accordance with
identified grade configurations subject to the following:

(A) If the district's average ADM for the
three (3) immediately preceding school years is greater
than the district's ADM from the previous school year
decreased by more than five percent (5%) compared to one
(1) year from the immediately preceding school year, each
reported school shall be computed based upon the average of
the by multiplying each reported school's ADM counts
completed at the end of the three (3) one (1) year from the
immediately preceding school years year by ninety-five
percent (95%), otherwise each reported school within the
district shall be computed based on the school's ADM for
the previous immediately preceding school year;

(v) Based upon ADM computations and identified
school configurations within each district pursuant to
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
paragraph (iv) of this subsection, compute the foundation
program amount for each district as prescribed by the
education resource block grant model adopted by the Wyoming
legislature as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv)., as
contained within the spreadsheets and accompanying reports
referenced under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii). The following
criteria shall be used by the state superintendent in the
administration of the education resource block grant model:

(B) Alternative schools qualifying for
separate consideration under the education resource block
grant model may be established by a school district for
offering educational programs to students with educational
needs which the district finds are not appropriately met by
other schools in the district, excluding charter schools
established under W.S. 21-3-301 through 21-3-314.
Alternative schools included within a district's
configuration of schools identified under paragraph (iv) of
this subsection shall for purposes of the education
resource block grant model:

(IV) Except as otherwise provided in
subdivision (V) of this subparagraph, on and after July 1,
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
2014, and if not qualifying under subdivision (I) of this
subparagraph, Be approved as an alternative school by the
state superintendent subject to the following:

(G) Amounts within the education resource
block grant model for maintenance and operations shall be
based upon the lesser of the actual educational gross
square footage of school buildings and facilities or the
education space prescribed by statewide adequacy standards
under W.S. 21-15-115 subject to the following:

(I) Actual gross square footage of
school buildings and facilities shall be separated into
education and noneducation space categories by school and
by district, including leased square footage but excluding
square footage not used for delivering the required
educational program and the square footage of any building
or facility closed and not operational as provided under
W.S. 21-15-109(c)(iv);

(II) Actual gross square footage of
education space shall be the gross square footage
prescribed by statewide building adequacy standards
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
promulgated pursuant to W.S. 21-15-115. Except as otherwise
provided in this subdivision, Education space capacity in
excess of one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the
standard space level shall not be included in actual gross
square footage computations under this subdivision. For
school year 2025-2026, education space capacity in excess
of one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the standard
space level shall not be included in actual gross square
footage computations under this subdivision;

(vi) Except for charter schools established
under W.S. 21-3-301 through 21-3-314 and alternative
schools approved under subdivision (v)(B)(IV) of this
subsection, any alteration of the configuration of grades
within a district, school or school facility which differs
from the configuration of grades during the immediately
preceding school year as reported under paragraph (iv) of
this subsection shall be considered a reconfiguration and
shall be documented by the district and reported to the
state superintendent and the director of the state
construction department. Following review and evaluation,
the state superintendent and the director of the state
construction department shall, each acting independently,
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
approve or deny the reconfiguration for purposes of
application to the education resource block grant model and
the determination of school facility needs and remedies.
The following shall apply:

(C) Effective for the school year
commencing after July 1, 2012, and each school year
thereafter, No reconfiguration of grades within any
district, school or facility shall differ from the previous
school year such that more than one (1) school is included
within any one (1) school facility to be reported under
paragraph (iv) of this subsection for purposes of
determining the foundation program amount for that
district;

(o) To the extent specifically provided by the
legislature, and between periods of model recalibration
required under subsection (t) of this section, the amount
computed for each district under subsection (m) of this
section shall be adjusted to provide for the effects of
inflation, excluding those amounts specified under
subparagraphs subparagraph (m)(v)(E) and, for school year
2026-2027 only, subparagraph (F) of this section, the
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
technology and equipment component as specified in W.S.
21-13-309.1(c)(xxii), the gifted and talented students
component as specified in W.S. 21-13-309.1(c)(xxiii) and
the short cycle and formative assessment component
contained in paragraph (b)(xxviii) of "Attachment A" as
referenced as specified in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii)
21-13-309.1(c)(xxvi). The adjustment under this subsection
shall not be applied until the expiration of the school
year immediately following the first school year of
application of the recalibrated model, and shall be
adjusted on a cumulative basis each school year not less
than one (1) time every two (2) school years thereafter and
until the first school year of application of a subsequent
model recalibration. Following analysis of information
reported under subsection (u) of this section, the joint
appropriations interim committee shall submit a
recommendation to the legislature and the governor not
later than November 1 of each applicable year on an
external cost adjustment for purposes of this subsection.

(u) To ensure model components specified under the
education resource block grant model defined under W.S.
21-13-101(a)(xiv), as enumerated and enacted by the
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
legislature and included in "Attachment A" referenced in
W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii) as specified by W.S. 21-13-309.1,
remain resourced at cost-based levels between periods of
model recalibration required under subsection (t) of this
section, and prior to adjustment for the effects of
inflation for any school year under subsection (o) of this
section, the joint education interim committee shall
annually receive and review reports in accordance with this
subsection and report to the joint appropriations interim
committee as required by this subsection. The legislative
service office shall assemble information necessary to
develop a model monitoring process and other reports for
the committee using data maintained by the department of
education and other state agencies. For this purpose, the
department shall annually update and compile information,
in a format contained within reports provided during 2010
2025 model recalibration, reported at the model component
level, on school district allocation of model resources, as
well as other information provided for purposes of
developing and completing the 2010 2025 cost of education
studies. Each year Not less than one (1) time every two
(2) years, excluding the first school year of application
of any model recalibration performed under subsection (t)
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
of this section, the information and analysis assembled by
the legislative service office under this subsection shall
be reported to the joint education interim committee in
sufficient time to allow committee review of and
deliberation on the report and the submission of
recommendations to the joint appropriations interim
committee by October 15 of the applicable school year.
Report recommendations shall be used by the joint
appropriations interim committee in its determination of
legislative recommendation on model adjustment under
subsection (o) of this section.

21-13-310. Annual computation of district revenues.

(a) To ensure revenues available to each district are
uniformly sufficient to enable compliance with the uniform
standards for educational programs prescribed under W.S.
21-9-101 and 21-9-102 and to secure state board
accreditation of educational programs under W.S.
21-2-304(a)(ii), the revenues specified under this
subsection shall be deemed state revenues and shall be
considered in determining the amount to be distributed to
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
each district under W.S. 21-13-311. A district shall make
an annual computation of the following revenues:

(xv) One-half (1/2) of the amount of realized
investment earning received on school district investments;

(xv)(xvi) All other revenues received or
collected by the district during the previous school year,
but excluding any amount received from private
contributions and gifts, excluding any revenues dedicated
by law to the payment of bonded indebtedness, and any
revenues from the disposition of school buildings and land
pursuant to W.S. 21-15-123(f)(vi), and excluding fees or
other charges imposed by the district for goods or
services, such as rental fees and the price paid for
admission into any place for recreation, entertainment or
an athletic event. Upon application of a district, the
department shall exclude from this paragraph revenue
received by the district if the department finds that the
revenue could not be used by the district to provide
educational services to students.

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
21-13-313. Distribution of funds from foundation
account; property tax and cash reserve adjustment;
regulations.

(b) The state superintendent shall determine on or
before August 15 September 1 of each year the tentative
allotment of foundation funds to which each district is
entitled under this article. In making this determination,
the state superintendent may, if current fiscal information
required by law to compute the tentative allotment is not
available for any district, by August 1 of that year, use
fiscal information available to the state superintendent
from the foundation program computations of the previous
school year for that district. The previous year's fiscal
information shall be adjusted to reflect current fiscal
changes and other information known by or available to the
state superintendent. Upon receiving actual fiscal
information from a district, the state superintendent shall
accordingly adjust future foundation program determinations
for that district such that foundation program payments
appropriately reflect current fiscal information for the
applicable school year.

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(c) Fifteen percent (15%) Ten percent (10%) of each
district's entitlement shall be paid to the district on or
before August 15 July 15 of each year and subject to any
adjustment under subsections (d) and (e) of this section,
ten percent (10%) nine percent (9%) of each district's
entitlement shall be paid on or about the fifteenth day of
each month through April of each year. The final payment
for the balance of each district's entitlement shall be
distributed on or before May 15 of each year. If, after
March 1 and before April 1, the state superintendent
determines that the entitlement to be paid to a district
for that school year is not accurate, the state
superintendent shall adjust payments to or payments from
that district as necessary to correct the inaccuracy as
soon as practicable. Except as provided under W.S.
21-2-202(e) and 21-13-307(b), after March 31 June 30 of any
school year, the state superintendent shall not adjust any
district's entitlement or fiscal information used to
compute a district's entitlement for that school year, and
the entitlement or fiscal information shall only be
adjusted thereafter in accordance with audit review
pursuant to W.S. 9-1-513.

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(e) Not later than January 31 of each fiscal year,
and except where a different percentage is otherwise
specified in this subsection, the department shall compute
the amount by which each district's operating balance and
cash reserves at the end of the preceding fiscal year
exceed fifteen percent (15%) twenty percent (20%) of the
total foundation program amount computed under W.S.
21-13-309, 21-13-309.1, 21-13-321, 21-13-339 and 21-13-340
for the preceding fiscal year. In making this calculation,
the entire operating balance and cash reserves for each
district for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1997, as
computed by the department, shall be separately accounted
for and excluded, until it has been completely expended by
the district. Revenues from settlements of protested
amounts attributable to levies assessed under W.S.
21-13-102(a)(i)(A) and (ii)(A) and 21-13-201, regardless of
the assessment year, shall be accounted for and excluded
from the calculation under this subsection for a period of
not more than one (1) year following that fiscal year in
which the revenue was received by a district, as verified
in writing by the district and certified by the county
treasurer. Except as otherwise provided in 1997 Special
Session Laws, chapter 3, section 306(e), as amended, and
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
except as excluded under this subsection, that excess shall
be deemed to be a state revenue under W.S. 21-13-310(a) for
the purpose of determining distributions under W.S.
21-13-311 and amounts to be rebated under W.S. 21-13-102.
The department shall promulgate rules, including reporting
requirements and procedures for districts, to implement
this subsection. As used in this section, "operating
balance and cash reserves" means those financial resources
of the district which are not encumbered by the district
board of trustees for expenditure to meet an existing legal
obligation or otherwise restricted by law or regulation for
expenditure on specific educational programs. For purposes
of this subsection, any balance within a district's
separate account established under W.S. 21-15-109(e) for
major building and facility repair and replacement shall be
deemed restricted by law for expenditure as provided by
W.S. 21-15-109(e) and shall not be considered an operating
balance and cash reserve under this section. For the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2022 through the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2028, the department shall compute the amount by
which each district's operating balance and cash reserves
at the end of the preceding fiscal year exceed thirty
percent (30%) of the total foundation program amount
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
computed under W.S. 21-13-309, 21-13-309.1, 21-13-321,
21-13-339 and 21-13-340 for the preceding fiscal year.
During this period, the amount of a district's operating
balance and cash reserves that may be increased from
fifteen percent (15%) to thirty percent (30%) of the total
foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309 for
the preceding fiscal year shall be accounted for and
reported separately and shall not be transferred or
expended for purposes of capital construction. For purposes
of this subsection, "capital construction" does not include
major building and facility repair and replacement as
defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a)(iii).

(g) In addition to subsections (b) and (c) of this
section, the state superintendent shall, for any district
subject to W.S. 21-13-102(b) as determined by the
department for any school year, or for any district not
subject to W.S. 21-13-102(b) whose entitlement amount
determined under W.S. 21-13-311(a) for any school year is
equal to or less than twenty percent (20%) of the
foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p),
and upon demonstration by the district of financial need as
documented by cash flow analysis, provide payments from the
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
public school foundation program account in an amount not
to exceed one-fifth (1/5) of the foundation program amount
computed for that district for that school year in
accordance with W.S. 21-13-309. The computed amount shall
be paid to each eligible district on or before September 1
after July 1 based upon tentative computations under W.S.
21-13-309, for which the department may use fiscal
information available from foundation program computations
for the previous school year in the manner provided under
subsection (b) of this section. Any district receiving a
payment under this subsection shall repay the public school
foundation program account not later than December 15 June
15 of that school year.

21-13-320. Student transportation; amount within
school foundation program formula for transportation
maintenance and operations expenditures and school bus
purchases; district reporting requirements.

(b) There shall be an amount computed for each school
district equal to the base price amount for bus purchase
and lease payment expenditures made by the district during
the previous school year pursuant to subsection (g) of this
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
section and for the amount actually expended by the
district during the previous school year for:

(f) The department of education shall adopt necessary
rules and regulations to implement and enforce state
standards established under this section and to administer
this section. District expenditures computed under
subsection (b) of this section shall not include
expenditures for employee contributions to the Wyoming
retirement system exceeding the amount specified in W.S.
9-3-413.1(b)(iii) 21-13-339 of any member employee's
salary. Beginning school year 2027-2028, district
expenditures computed under subsection (b) of this section
shall not include expenditures for employer contributions
to the state group insurance plan specified in W.S.
21-13-340. In addition, the department shall, in accordance
with procedures prescribed by department rule, and
regulation, establish a base price for each school bus type
or other student transportation vehicle type for the
applicable fiscal period that complies with minimum state
standards for vehicle specifications and equipment. The
department shall also establish a process including
competitive bidding which guarantees the acquisition of
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
school buses and other student transportation vehicles
approved for reimbursement and complying with state minimum
standards and district fleet size restrictions at the
established base price for the applicable fiscal year.
Department rules shall establish appropriate restrictions
on how and under which conditions a school district may
procure a school bus or other student transportation
vehicle, either through purchase or lease, to ensure that
the procurement method used is the most cost effective.
School districts shall notify the department of school bus
and other student transportation vehicle needs and
requirements for the appropriate fiscal year in the manner
and within the times prescribed by department rule, and
regulation, and shall report expenditures, and purchases
and lease arrangements for the applicable reporting period,
including vehicles replaced by purchases, and leases, as
required by department rule. and regulation. The department
shall annually review and conduct audits as necessary of
information submitted under this section. As authorized
under W.S. 21-13-307(b), the department may correct the
information reported by districts under this section as
necessary to fairly and accurately reflect the data type,
classification and format required to administer this
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
section in accordance with law and department rules. and
regulations.

(g) In addition to amounts provided pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, and for purchases and
leases conducted in a manner consistent with department
rules, the transportation adjustment for each district
under this section shall include an department shall
reimburse each school district for the amount computed
under this subsection expended for the purchase or lease of
school buses and other vehicles used primarily for the
transportation of students to and from school and to and
from school activities. Computations of Amounts provided
under this subsection shall be in addition to and shall not
be considered in determining the school foundation program
amount under the education resource block grant model
pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309. Amounts reimbursed under this
subsection shall be based upon the base price established
by the department under subsection (f) of this section for
the student transportation vehicle type. Amounts included
within the adjustment under this subsection and shall be
subject to the following:

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(v) The adjustment Reimbursement for the
purchase or lease of buses and other student transportation
vehicles authorized under this subsection shall be paid by
the department not later than three (3) months after the
month in which the school district expends the funds for
the purchase and shall be in an amount equal to:

(A) One-fifth (1/5) of The base price
established under subsection (f) of this section for each
purchased school bus or other purchased student
transportation vehicle for which reimbursement is
authorized and which is made purchased by the district;
during the preceding five (5) years;

(vi) Amounts included within the adjustment for
School bus purchases or leases that are fully or partially
paid for or rebated under the Diesel Emissions Reduction
Act, 42 U.S.C. § 16131 et seq., or other similar program,
shall be made in accordance with department rule and
regulation.

(m) No district shall purchase or lease a school bus
unless it first demonstrates to the department and the
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
department determines that the school district has in good
faith attempted to purchase or lease a bus that will be
fully or partially paid for or rebated under the Diesel
Emissions Reduction Act, 42 U.S.C. § 16131 et seq., or
other similar program.

21-13-321. Special education; amount provided for
special education programs and services; reimbursement for
out-of-district placements; district reporting
requirements; billing for Medicaid authorized school based
services.

(b) Except for expenditures for out-of-district
special education placements, the amount provided to a
school district for special education shall be equal to one
hundred percent (100%) of the amount actually expended by
the district during the previous school year for special
education programs and services, which shall include the
amount actually expended by the district during the
previous school year for reasonable administrative costs to
bill for authorized Medicaid services under subsection (h)
of this section. Amounts awarded provided under this
section shall be in addition to and shall not be considered
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
in determining the school foundation program amount under
the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S.
21-13-309. Except for expenditures for out-of-district
special education placements, the department of education
shall distribute the amount computed under this section to
each school district in the same proportion and schedule of
distributions under W.S. 21-13-313(c). Expenditures by a
district for out-of-district special education placements
shall be reimbursed in the year in which the costs are
incurred and shall be distributed to each school district
on a quarterly basis in accordance with rules adopted by
the department of education.

(d) The department of education shall adopt necessary
rules and regulations to implement and administer this
section. Districts shall report special education program
expenditures for the applicable reporting period as
required by department rule and regulation. District
expenditures computed under subsection (b) of this section
shall not include expenditures for employee contributions
to the Wyoming retirement system exceeding the amount
specified in W.S. 9-3-413.1(b)(iii) 21-13-339 of any member
employee's salary. Beginning school year 2027-2028,
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
district expenditures computed under subsection (b) of this
section shall not include expenditures for employer
contributions to the state group insurance plan specified
in W.S. 21-13-340. The department shall annually review and
report to the joint education interim committee regarding
services provided to special education students by school
districts. In addition, the department shall when
necessary, conduct audits of information submitted by
districts under this section and may, in accordance with
W.S. 21-13-307(b), correct the information reported by
districts as necessary to fairly and accurately reflect the
data type, classification and format required to administer
this section in accordance with law and department rule and
regulation.

21-13-338. Career and technical education supplies,
materials, equipment and repair of equipment; criteria;
limitations.

(a) Commencing with school year 2025-2026, To augment
amounts within the education resource block grant model
available to districts for career and technical education
programs, the department of education shall distribute
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
career and technical education supplies, materials,
equipment and repair of equipment funding in accordance
with this section.

(c) Amounts distributed to each school district for
career and technical education supplies, materials,
equipment and repair of equipment funding under this
section shall be calculated as follows:

(i) Except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this
subsection, the product of each school's FTE career and
technical education teachers reported under subsection (b)
of this section multiplied by fourteen thousand one hundred
eighty-four dollars and sixty-eight cents ($14,184.68)
fourteen thousand three hundred thirty-six dollars
($14,336.00);

(ii) If a school's FTE career and technical
education teachers reported in subsection (b) of this
section is less than two (2), the amount of funding for the
school's career and technical education supplies,
materials, equipment and repair of equipment funding shall
be equal to twenty-eight thousand three hundred sixty-nine
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
dollars and thirty-six cents ($28,369.36) twenty-eight
thousand six hundred seventy-two dollars ($28,672.00);

(iii) The department shall further adjust the
amounts for career and technical education supplies,
materials, equipment and repair of equipment funding in
paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection by any external
cost adjustment enacted by the legislature for the
educational materials category of the educational resource
block grant model.

(e) Each district shall report to the department on
the expenditure of amounts distributed under this section
and shall provide other information as required by rule of
the department. Amounts distributed under this section
shall only be expended on supplies, materials, equipment
and repair of equipment for career and technical education
programs.

21-13-504. Special reserve fund.

(a) Except as prohibited under subsection (b) of this
section, the board of trustees of each Wyoming school
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
district may create a special reserve fund of a specified
amount, for the purpose of purchasing or replacing
specified equipment or a depreciation reserve for equipment
and school building repair. The board may annually include
in its budget for the ensuing fiscal year, the amount so
designated, as a special fund, expendable only for the
purposes stated and segregated as such, from general and
other special school funds, disbursements therefrom to be
made from time to time by the school clerk's warrants drawn
against said special fund, as duly ordered by said board;
provided, that said amount so specially budgeted for any
fiscal year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total
amount budgeted for the same year; and further provided,
that any difference in the amount so specially budgeted for
any such year and the amount expended from said fund during
such year, may be retained in and carried over as a part of
the special reserve fund.

(b) In no event shall any funds generated by the
school foundation program, defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(v),
that are transferred to a special reserve fund be expended
by the board of trustees of a school district for major
building and facility repair or replacement, as defined
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
under W.S. 21-15-109(a)(iii), for a project, as defined
under W.S. 21-15-111(a)(iv) or for any educational
building, office building, portable building, teacherage or
warehouse building, as defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a).

Section 3. W.S. 9-3-201(a) and (c) through (e),
9-3-203(a)(iv), 9-3-205(a)(xvi), 9-3-207(a) and (b),
9-3-210(a), (e) and (f), 9-3-211(a), 9-3-217 and 21-7-301
are amended to read:

9-3-201. Group prepaid plans authorized; agreements
with insurance companies authorized; limitation on
authorized plans and companies; payroll deductions;
self-insurance programs; school district and boards of
cooperative services participation.

(a) Expect as otherwise specified in this subsection,
the state of Wyoming and its political subdivisions and
school districts may obtain group prepaid plans or
insurance for life, health, accident or hospitalization for
their employees and for elected officials, except for
members of the legislature, and enter into agreements with
prepaid plans or insurance companies to provide this
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
coverage. Each school district and board of cooperative
educational services shall provide insurance coverage for
school district or board of cooperative educational
services its employees meeting the definition of employee
under as defined by W.S. 9-3-203(a)(iv), shall, if elected
by the district or board under subsection (e) of this
section, be provided through the state employees' and
officials' group insurance plan in accordance with W.S.
9-3-202 through 9-3-218 and as required by W.S. 21-13-340
and subsection (e) of this section. Insurance coverage for
retired school district or board of cooperative educational
services employees shall, if elected by the board or
district under subsection (e) of this section and if the
retired employee was who were continuously covered under
the board's or district's insurance plan prior to the
election, the board's or district's enrollment in the state
employees' and officials' group insurance program, shall be
provided through the state employees' and officials' group
insurance plan in accordance with W.S. 9-3-202 through
9-3-218. If a school district or board of cooperative
educational services elects to cease participation in the
group insurance plan pursuant to subsection (f) of this
section, the election shall apply to retired employees of
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
that board or district who are receiving coverage under
this subsection.

(c) Upon a request in writing from any employee of
the state of Wyoming, any covered political subdivision
thereof or a participating school district, the state
auditor or the proper officer in any political subdivision
or school district may deduct from the wages of the
employee the amount of the premium which the employee has
agreed to pay for the prepaid plans or insurance, and to
pay or remit the payment directly to the prepaid plan or
insurance company issuing the group plan or insurance.

(d) The state and any political subdivision are
authorized to utilize a self-insurance program, provided
that a defined plan with proper funding is first adopted
and the cost of the plan is included in the annual budget
and provided the self-insurance program includes any
coverage mandated by Wyoming insurance law. Any
self-insurance program, including the Wyoming state
employees' and officials' group insurance plan, adopted
pursuant to this section shall be within the jurisdiction
of the insurance commissioner under the provisions of title
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
26, Wyoming statutes. This subsection shall not be
construed to authorize a school district or board of
cooperative educational services to provide insurance
coverage for employees outside the state employees' and
officials' group insurance plan.

(e) Each school district or board of cooperative
educational services may elect to shall participate in the
state employees' and officials' group insurance plan by
filing notification of election with the department of
administration and information on a form and in a manner as
prescribed by the department. Participation in the plan
for any electing board or district by all boards and
districts shall commence not less than one hundred twenty
(120) days following the date on which the board or
district filed notification under this subsection later
than July 1, 2027 and shall be identical to plans and
coverage provided other enrollees under this act. The
department shall notify the electing board or district of
the date on which the board or district is eligible to
participate in the state group insurance plan. An election
by a board or district to participate in the state group
insurance plan under this subsection is irrevocable for a
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
period of five (5) years from the date on which plan
participation originally commenced. In addition to all
other remedies available to the department, if a district
or board withdraws from the state group insurance plan
during the period of irrevocability, the department may
assess against the withdrawing board or district the amount
by which all claims paid on behalf of employees of the
board or district exceeds total premiums paid by the board
or district and their employees. A board or district may
renew its initial participation in the state group
insurance plan without interruption upon submitting
notification of renewal to the department prior to
expiration of the initial five (5) year participation
period. Renewal of plan participation shall be irrevocable
for an additional period of not less than five (5) years.

9-3-203. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(iv) "Employee" means any employee of a
participating school district or participating board of
cooperative educational services whose salary is paid by
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
funds of the district or board, a volunteer firefighter,
volunteer emergency medical technician or a volunteer
search and rescue person as provided by W.S. 9-3-220 or any
official or employee of the state of Wyoming whose salary
is paid by state funds, including employees and faculty
members of the University of Wyoming and various community
colleges in the state, except persons employed on
intermittent, irregular, or less than halftime basis and
any at-will contract employee who does not meet the
requirements established under W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III)
or (IV). "Employee" shall not include employees of the
agricultural extension service of the University of Wyoming
who hold federal civil service appointments, are required
to participate in federal civil service retirement and who
elect to participate in the federal employees' health
benefit program as authorized in W.S. 9-3-210(d);

9-3-205. Administration and management of group
insurance program; powers and duties; adoption of rules and
regulations; interfund borrowing authority.

(a) The department shall administer and manage the
state employees' and officials' group insurance program in
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
accordance with all provisions of title 26 of the Wyoming
statutes governing group health benefit plans and rules
promulgated thereto. The department, subject to the
provisions of this act:

(xvi) Have authority to audit payroll records of
voluntary participating employers, school districts and
boards of cooperative services to ensure compliance with
requirements of this act.

9-3-207. Eligibility for membership in plan; state
employees; thirty-one (31) day period to elect enrollment;
new employees; later enrollment.

(a) Any state, school district or board of
cooperative services employee eligible for membership in
the group insurance plan at the time the plan becomes
effective shall have thirty-one (31) days to either elect
to be enrolled or not be enrolled in the plan. The
department shall establish the procedure by which eligible
employees shall notify the department of their decision
within the prescribed thirty-one (31) day period.

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(b) An eligible employee who enters state service,
enters service as a volunteer firefighter, volunteer
emergency medical technician or volunteer search and rescue
person or enters service of a voluntary participating
employer has thirty-one (31) days from the initial date of
employment or ninety (90) days from the initial date of
becoming a volunteer firefighter, volunteer emergency
medical technician or volunteer search and rescue person as
provided by W.S. 9-3-220 to elect to be enrolled or not be
enrolled in the group insurance plan. A person who enters
service as a volunteer firefighter, volunteer emergency
medical technician or volunteer search and rescue person
shall volunteer for ninety (90) days before becoming
eligible for coverage under the group insurance plan. After
the ninety (90) day period is over, a volunteer shall have
thirty-one (31) days to elect to be enrolled or not be
enrolled in the group insurance plan.

9-3-210. Amount of state's contribution; estimates
submitted to state budget officer; specified employees
participation in federal program; participating employers
contributions.

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(a) Except for voluntary participating employers,
school districts, boards of cooperative services, volunteer
firefighters, volunteer emergency medical technicians and
volunteer search and rescue persons under W.S. 9-3-220, the
state shall contribute monthly the amount established and
appropriated by the legislature for each employee and
official enrolled in the plan in accordance with
subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

(e) A participating Each school district shall pay to
the department the monthly premium established by the
department for coverage of each eligible employee or
official of that district electing to become covered by any
portion of the group insurance plan. Monthly premiums
shall be at minimum no less than rates assessed for
coverage of other enrollees qualified under W.S.
9-3-203(a)(iv), and shall be based upon information
reported by the participating district to the department,
to be in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(f) A participating Each board of cooperative
educational services shall pay to the department the
monthly premium established by the department for coverage
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
of each eligible employee of the employer electing to
become covered by any portion of the group insurance plan.
Additionally, each participating board of cooperative
educational services shall pay to the department a monthly
amount equal to the lowest premium for nonsupplemental
coverage for each eligible employee of the employer not
electing to become covered under the nonsupplemental
portion of the group insurance plan. For purposes of this
subsection an employee shall not be considered as not
electing coverage if that employee is covered by other
insurance with benefits comparable to or greater than the
coverage provided by the least expensive non-supplemental
plan available under this act. Monthly premiums shall be
at minimum no less than rates assessed for coverage of
other enrollees qualified under W.S. 9-3-203(a)(iv), and
shall be based upon information reported by the
participating board of cooperative educational services to
the department, to be in a form and manner prescribed by
the department.

9-3-211. Deductions from salaries of monthly
contributions by employees and officials; establishment of
procedure.
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(a) The amount of monthly contribution to be made by
eligible employees and officials, excluding volunteer
firefighters, volunteer emergency medical technicians and
volunteer search and rescue persons under W.S. 9-3-220,
enrolled in the group insurance plan for themselves and
their dependents shall be deducted from the monthly
salaries of the employees and officials by the various
agencies or voluntary participating employers, school
districts and boards of cooperative services and remitted
to the department. The procedure for deductions and
remittances shall be established by the department. If a
flexible benefits plan is chosen, the employees' and
officials' contribution shall be applied to the chosen
benefits in an amount determined by the employee or
official.

9-3-217. Advisory panel; composition; compensation.

(a) The director of the department shall establish an
advisory panel consisting of active plan participants
employed by the state, participating school districts, the
University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges and of
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
retired employees who are plan participants. The panel
shall consist of no more than ten (10) members if there are
less than five (5) participating school districts or no
more than twelve (12) members if there are at least five
(5) participating school districts and, insofar as
possible, shall proportionally represent the specified
employee groups participating in the group health insurance
plan. The advisory panel shall be consulted regarding plan
benefits and costs. The director of the department shall,
upon receiving notification from at least five (5) school
districts electing group insurance plan participation under
W.S. 9-3-201(e), appoint two (2) additional advisory panel
members to increase the advisory panel to twelve (12)
members as provided in this section.

(b) State, participating school district, university
and community college employee members of the panel shall
suffer no loss of wages for the time devoted to attending
meetings of the panel called by the department. All
members shall be provided per diem and travel expenses
incurred for attending such meetings at the rates provided
under W.S. 9-3-102 and 9-3-103.

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
21-7-301. Insurance and other fringe and employment
benefits.

(a) The board of trustees of each school district
within the state may provide health insurance, life
insurance, and other fringe and employment benefits of all
types for the teachers, administrative personnel and other
employees of the school district to such extent as it deems
such benefits to be in the best interest of the school
district. Benefits under this subsection may be paid for
entirely by the school district or partly by the school
district and partly by the employee, the degree of
participation of each being entirely within the discretion
of the board of trustees. Benefits under this subsection
may be in addition to any benefits obtained through the
state employees' and officials' group insurance plan if
elected by the school district under W.S. 9-3-201(e) and
21-13-340(b).

(b) The board of trustees of each school district
which is a participating district in the state employees'
and officials' group insurance plan, as defined under W.S.
9-3-203(a)(xvi), shall provide insurance under the state
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
employees' and officials' group plan for the teachers,
administrative personnel and other employees meeting the
definition of employee under W.S. 9-3-203(a)(iv), as
provided by W.S. 9-3-202 through 9-3-218. Each
participating school district shall report to the
department of administration and information and make
payments for employer and employee contributions as
provided by W.S. 9-3-210 and 9-3-211. The amount of
contributions paid under W.S. 9-3-211 for each employee
electing coverage shall be deducted from the employee's
monthly salary in accordance with W.S. 9-3-211.

Section 4. W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvi)(A)(I), (B)(I),
(C)(I) and (xvii), 21-13-309(m)(v)(B)(I), (V), (C) and
(G)(III), 21-13-320(g)(v)(B) and (h)(i) are repealed.

Section 5. W.S. 9-3-201(f), 9-3-203(a)(xiv), (xv) and
(xvi), 9-3-207(e), 21-13-309.1(c)(xxxvi), as created by
this act, and 21-13-309(m)(v)(F) are repealed.

Section 6. 2011 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 185,
ATTACHMENT "A", 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99,
Section 3, 2017 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 205, Sections
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
3 and 4, 2018 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 185 Sections 2
and 3 and 2025 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 108, Section 3
are repealed.

Section 7.

(a) The select committee on school finance
recalibration as created by 2025 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 140 is hereby continued. As specified in subsection
(b) of this section, the select committee shall continue
the recalibration study of the education resource block
grant model as required by W.S. 21-13-309(t) to ensure the
model remains cost-based. The study shall include any
potential responses to judicial directives. The legislative
service office shall staff the select committee.

(b) At a minimum, the select committee on school
finance recalibration shall study the following areas in
the context of K-12 public education:

(i) Mental health supports, including core
counselors, nurses and at-risk pupil support resources. The
study shall include consideration of data collected from
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
school years 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 for amounts
distributed pursuant to 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
118, Section 2, Section 331 to schools for mental health
services;

(ii) School safety and security personnel,
including employment of school resource officers;

(iii) School nutrition programs, including the
school lunch programs;

(iv) Technology, including the necessity of one
(1) computer for each student for all K-12 public students
and district and school-level technology infrastructure and
cyber security.

(c) The select committee on school finance
recalibration shall report its recommendations and any
associated legislation to the legislature. The select
committee may sponsor and introduce legislation as provided
in W.S. 28-8-104(e).

HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(d) The select committee on school finance
recalibration shall remain in existence until December 31,
2026. Composition of the select committee and appointment
of members shall be as contained in 2025 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 140, Section 1(a) and (b). Any vacancy
occurring on the select committee shall be filled without
delay by the president of the senate or the speaker of the
house of representatives, as appropriate.

(e) The department of education, other state
agencies, school districts and the school data advisory
committee established under W.S. 21-2-203(d) shall collect
and provide information requested by the select committee
or professional consultant experts working with the select
committee.

Section 8. Five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the
legislative service office to fund the model recalibration
study in accordance with section 7 of this act and for the
purposes of providing salary, including salary for the
chairmen under W.S. 28-5-101(e)(i), mileage and per diem to
members of the select committee on school finance
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
recalibration and for other expenses of the select
committee authorized by law or policy of the legislature.
Funds appropriated under this section expended to conduct
the recalibration of the education resource block grant
model shall be in accordance with a contractual agreement
entered into between the management council and
professional consultants. This appropriation shall be for
the period beginning with the effective date of this
section and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall
not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and
any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028.

Section 9.

(a) Twenty million five hundred sixty-five thousand
nine hundred fifty-five dollars ($20,565,955.00) is
appropriated from the public school foundation program
account to the department of education-school finance to
reimburse school districts for the remaining balance of
buses and other student transportation vehicles previously
authorized for reimbursement under W.S. 21-13-320. This
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2028.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028.

(b) Two hundred sixteen million five hundred thousand
dollars ($216,500,000.00) is appropriated from the public
school foundation program account to the department of
education-school finance for payments to school districts
in accordance with W.S. 21‑13‑311, 21‑13‑313(b), (c) and (g),
21-13-339 and 21-13-340 to supplement amounts otherwise
appropriated by the 2026 legislature in 2026 Senate File
0001 for the school foundation program. This appropriation
shall be for the period beginning with the effective date
of this section and ending June 30, 2028. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028.

Section 10.
HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161

(a) For the period beginning on the effective date of
this section and ending June 30, 2028, three million
twenty-six thousand five hundred eighty-seven dollars
($3,026,587.00) or so much thereof as is necessary is
appropriated to the department of administration and
information from the separate employee health insurance
account established under W.S. 9‑3‑213(a). The department of
administration and information is authorized up to eleven
(11) full-time permanent positions. The appropriation under
this section shall be expended on the positions authorized
by this subsection, support costs, equipment and
contracting costs necessary to administer and implement
participation in the state employees' and officials' group
insurance plan as required under this act. It is the intent
of the legislature that, of this appropriation, one hundred
thirty-eight thousand eight hundred dollars ($138,800.00)
not be included in the department of administration and
information's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

(b) The department of education, in consultation with
the department of administration and information, shall
100 HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
collect necessary data from school districts and boards of
cooperative educational services to estimate the impact of
adding school districts and boards of cooperative services
to the state employees' and officials' group insurance plan
as required by this act. Each school district and board of
cooperative educational services not currently
participating in the state employees' and officials' group
insurance plan shall report to the department of education
an estimated timeline when the school district or board of
cooperative educational services will begin participation
in the state employees' and officials' group insurance
plan, the number of eligible employees and dependents, the
number of eligible retired employees and dependents, a
three (3) year history of total medical, prescription and,
to the extent available, dental claims, incurred and paid
by the district, and any other data or information the
department of administration and information deems
necessary. Each district or board of cooperative
educational services shall report the data and information
required under this subsection or requested by the
department of administration and information to the
department of education not later than May 1, 2026.

101 HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(c) Any school district that intends to participate
in the state employees' and officials' group insurance plan
prior to July 1, 2027 shall notify the department of
administration and information one hundred twenty (120)
days prior to the date of participation in the state
employees' and officials' group insurance plan. The
effective date of the plan commences on the first day of
the month, one hundred twenty (120) days after notification
by the district to the department of administration and
information.

(d) The governor is authorized to borrow from the
legislative stabilization reserve account up to eighty
million dollars ($80,000,000.00), in aggregate, as
necessary to meet cash flow needs of the separate employee
health insurance account established under W.S. 9‑3‑213(a).
The department of administration and information shall
establish premiums pursuant to W.S. 9-3-205 to ensure that
any funds borrowed from the legislative stabilization
reserve account are repaid in full in not less than sixty
(60) months from the date funds are first borrowed.
Notwithstanding W.S. 9-1-418(b) no interest shall be
charged on any interfund borrowing authorized by this
102 HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
subsection. The governor shall report to the joint
appropriations committee immediately upon exercise of this
authority. This subsection shall only be effective from the
effective date of this section until June 30, 2028.

Section 11.

(a) There is appropriated five million dollars
($5,000,000.00) from the public school foundation program
account to the department of education-school finance to
continue the mental health service grant program
established through 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118,
Section 3, Section 331 for school year 2026-2027. The
appropriation under this section is intended to augment
amounts made available to school districts within the
education resource block grant model to address mental
health needs of the K-12 student population. Amounts
allocated under this section shall be based on the average
daily membership used to compute amounts within the
education resource block grant model for school year
2026-2027 as amended by section 2 of this act.

103 HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
(b) Each district receiving a grant under this
section shall report to the department of education-school
finance the expenditure of amounts awarded under this
section, the number of students that received services as a
result of the grant and the impact of the services provided
by the department.

(c) It is the intent of the legislature that the
appropriation in this section not be included in the
department of education's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

104 HB0110

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0161
Section 12.

(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 3 and 5 are effective July 1, 2027.

(c) Sections 7, 8, 10 and 11 are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
105 HB0110